California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) From the United States Department of Agriculture, any sum that is authorized to be paid to the owner from any appropriation that is made by the United States Department of Agriculture to assist in the eradication of brucellosis in cattle in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

Indemnity shall not be paid to any person in any of the following cases:

(a) For any steer or grade bull that is determined to be a reactor.

(b) For any bovine animal that is brought into a brucellosis control area, that reacts to a brucellosis test which is applied within 90 days after the arrival of the animal in the area as provided for in this chapter.

(c) For any bovine animal that is brought into a brucellosis control area, in violation of any law, any regulation of the department, or any rule or regulation of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(d) For any reacting bovine animal, until the premises, where the animal had been kept, have been cleaned and disinfected by the owner in a manner approved by an agent of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(e) For any reacting bovine animal that is not slaughtered within 30 days after the animal was appraised.

(f) For any animal that is owned by the United States, this state, or any county or city in the state.

(g) For any bovine animal that was vaccinated for brucellosis after reaching 12 months of age. However, indemnity shall be provided for any bovine animal that was vaccinated after reaching 12 months of age and that was part of an official whole herd adult vaccination plan approved by the secretary. “Official whole herd adult vaccination plan” means a plan, approved by the secretary, whereby all female cattle exceeding 12 months of age are vaccinated against brucellosis using an approved vaccine as defined in Section 10311 and are identified as required by the department.

(h) For any bovine animal in a herd that has been under an order to hold, issued pursuant to Section 9565, for more than 18 consecutive months, except as provided by subdivision (i).

(i) For any officially adult vaccinated bovine animal in a herd that has been under an order to hold, issued pursuant to Section 9565, for more than 22 consecutive months.

(j) If the person has violated any provision of this chapter that relates to a brucellosis control area, or any regulation that is adopted by the department that relates to such an area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.5.

(a) The owner of a herd that is subject to subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 10406 may appeal to the director in writing, on a form as prescribed by the director, for continuation of indemnity payments.

(b) Upon a determination that the herd owner was in full compliance with the laws and regulations, the director, notwithstanding Section 10406, may grant a continuation of indemnity payments to the herd owner for a period of time deemed appropriate by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 56, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

A subsequent payment of indemnity shall not be made to any person in any of the following cases:

(a) Unless the provisions of this chapter have been fully complied with for each and every bovine animal that is added to his herd.

(b) Unless and until the premises are maintained in a sanitary condition, which is satisfactory to the department or the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Slaughter of Exposed Nonreacting Animals [10421. - 10423.]

10421.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the secretary may proceed with the identification of nonreacting animals in a herd in the same manner as provided in Section 10401 and require the slaughter of those animals and the disinfection of the premises where the animals have been kept if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The secretary determines that bovine brucellosis cannot be eradicated or effectively controlled in the particular herd by the usual recognized methods.

(b) The secretary determines that slaughter of the remaining exposed nonreacting animals in the herd is the best and most practical method of attaining eradication or control.

(c) The secretary has entered into a voluntary agreement with the owner of the nonreacting animals to carry out the purposes and conditions of this chapter.

(d) Funds are available to indemnify the owner of the nonreacting animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10422.

The value of a nonreacting animal that is slaughtered shall be determined by appraisement by a representative of the department or a representative of the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, and by the owner or his or her agent. If these persons do not agree on the valuation of the animal, the animal shall be appraised by the chief appraiser of the department, or his or her representative. In either event, the value that is determined is final.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10422.5.

If a nonreacting animal is slaughtered pursuant to this article, and indemnity funds are available, the owner of the animal may receive part or all of the following:

(a) The proceeds of the sale of the salvage of the animal.

(b) From the United States Department of Agriculture, any sum that is authorized to be paid to the owner from any appropriation that is made by the United States Department of Agriculture to assist in the eradication of brucellosis in cattle in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10423.

Indemnity provided by this article shall not be paid in any of the following cases:

(a) For any bovine animal which reacts to the brucellosis test or shows active brucellosis prior to or at slaughter. In this case, the indemnity rate which is provided in Section 10405 shall apply.

(b) For any bovine animal, unless all exposed cattle, swine, goats, sheep, and horses on the premises are slaughtered.

(c) For any bovine animal, until the premises where the animal has been kept have been cleaned and disinfected by the owner in a manner which is approved by an agent of the department or of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(d) For any steer or grade bull.

(e) For any animal which is owned by the United States, this state, or any county or city in the state.

(f) If the owner is in violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation which is made by the department that relates to bovine brucellosis.

(g) For any animal which is not slaughtered within 30 days after such animal is appraised.

(h) For any bovine animal which originated in another state or country that has not been in this state for at least 90 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Brucellosis Eradication Compensation Costs [10492. - 10496.]

10492.

If an owner of cattle refuses to slaughter exposed, nonreacting bovine animals pursuant to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 10421) when requested by the director to do so, the cattle owner shall then be responsible for paying to the director the full costs of the department in eradicating brucellosis from his herd. Such responsibility shall begin with the refusal to slaughter exposed, nonreacting animals and shall continue until brucellosis is eradicated from the herd.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

10493.

The following procedures shall be followed when brucellosis has been identified in a herd of cattle:

(a) An official veterinarian shall conduct an epidemiological investigation of the infected herd and premises involved in order to determine the specific methods and actions necessary to eradicate the disease from the herd.

(b) Upon request of the owner of the infected herd, the investigation provided for in subdivision (a) shall be conducted with the assistance and participation of a licensed veterinarian selected by such owner.

(c) An official epidemiological report shall be prepared which shall specify the methods and actions necessary to eradicate the disease, and shall include reasonable guidelines for timing the accomplishment of the various tasks associated with such activity.

(d) Any person who is aggrieved at any determination made pursuant to this section may appeal in writing to the director within five days after notice of such determination. The director may affirm, reverse or modify such determination after his review of the epidemiological report and the issues involved.

(e) The epidemiological report required by subdivision (c) shall become the basis for a memorandum of understanding which shall be developed between the owner of the infected herd and the department covering the following points:

(1) Herd management practices that will be employed to facilitate the disease eradication effort.

(2) Any physical facilities modification that will be required in the eradication effort.

(3) Specific dates for accomplishing the various tasks required in the eradication effort.

This memorandum of understanding may be developed with the participation of a licensed veterinarian if such veterinarian participated in the epidemiological investigation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

10494.

If an owner of brucellosis infected or exposed cattle refuses to participate in the development and signing of the memorandum of understanding required by subdivision (e) of Section 10493, or fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of such memorandum, the cattle owner shall immediately become responsible for paying to the director all further costs incurred by the department in eradicating the disease from the herd of cattle owned by such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

10495.

If an owner of a brucellosis infected herd violates any law or regulation pertaining to brucellosis eradication, the cattle owner shall immediately become responsible for paying to the director all further costs incurred by the department in eradicating the disease from the herd of cattle owned by such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

10496.

(a) An owner who fails to achieve eradication of brucellosis in his or her herd is responsible for the costs of maintaining the required testing schedule after 24 months from the date of an order to hold issued by the director pursuant to Section 9565. Evidence of eradication shall consist of a release from a hold issued by the director pursuant to Section 9567.

(b) If the director requires an infected herd to be officially adult vaccinated to control the spread of the disease, the time interval provided in subdivision (a) shall be extended from 24 to 28 months.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the owner of a herd which, on the effective date of this section, is under an order to hold, issued by the director prior to that effective date, shall be subject to this section 24 months from that effective date or 28 months from that effective date for officially adult vaccinated herds.

(d) This section shall not apply to the owner of a herd that has been granted a continuation of indemnity payments as provided by Section 10406.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 320, Sec. 5.   Effective July 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Cattle Disease Control [10610. - 10610.]

10610.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Food and Agriculture may adopt regulations to control or eradicate cattle diseases, including bovine trichomoniasis, in any of the following ways:

(1) Requiring permits before entry of, and limitations on the importation of, cattle and other animals or materials that might act as a cause or a vector of a disease or condition that is infectious or contagious to cattle.

(2) Limitations on the intrastate or interstate movement of cattle, in compliance with any applicable federal law.

(3) Diagnostic tests, vaccinations, treatments, or other appropriate methods, including, but not limited to, the mandated reporting by designated parties of diseases or suspected diseases.

(4) Notification of owners of cattle that have been exposed, or may have been exposed, to infectious animals or materials.

(5) Similar means that the secretary finds and determines are necessary.

(b) (1) The secretary shall appoint an advisory task force, including, but not limited to, livestock industry representatives and university researchers, for the purposes of advising the secretary on the control and management of cattle health diseases and evaluating the effectiveness of programs established pursuant to this chapter. The secretary shall consult with the advisory task force prior to the adoption of regulations or the imposition of fees by the secretary.

(2) Members of the advisory task force, or alternate members when acting as members, may be reimbursed, upon request, for necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

(c) (1) Any person that willfully and knowingly violates any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) The secretary may, at his or her discretion, prosecute civilly or seek civil penalties, pursuant to Sections 9166 and 9167.

(d) The secretary may impose fees to offset the costs of any program established pursuant to this section, provided that the total fees collected do not exceed the actual costs of regulation or impair the department’s responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(e) The secretary is authorized to establish accounts within the Food and Agriculture Fund as necessary to efficiently administer the department’s responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or restrict the authority granted to the State Veterinarian in Section 9562.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DISEASED SWINE [10701. - 10990.]



  CHAPTER 1. Importation and Sale [10701. - 10791.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10701. - 10704.]

10701.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

“Health certificate” means a health certificate from either a veterinary inspector of the United States Department of Agriculture, the state veterinarian or livestock sanitation official of the state of origin, or of a licensed veterinarian approved by the state veterinarian or livestock sanitation official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

“Sales yard” includes any livestock yard, pen, corral, building, premises, or conveyance in which swine are assembled for sale, resale, exchange, or transfer by any owner or his agent. It does not, however, include any ranch premises where swine are assembled for sale, resale, exchange, or transfer by any owner or his agent in ordinary ranch-to-ranch transactions, or where swine are fed and fitted for slaughtering purposes only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

“Premises” is the farm of origin where swine were born and raised or where they have resided for a minimum of 90 continuous days immediately preceding shipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Importation [10721. - 10726.]

10721.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to import any swine into this state except for immediate slaughter, unless the person procures a health certificate and import permit from the department prior to the shipment or movement of the swine.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to import any swine into this state for immediate slaughter unless the person procures an import permit from the department prior to the shipment or movement of the swine.

(c) Any person requesting an import permit shall identify the premises of the swine prior to the shipment of the swine into the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.

The health certificate shall certify that the swine to which it refers satisfy all of the following requirements:

(a) Have not been exposesd to any communicable disease.

(b) Are free from evidence of any communicable disease.

The director, when he determines it to be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter, may, by regulation, require the certificate to certify that the swine have been immunized against hog cholera by a method of immunization which is designated by regulations of the director as an effective method of immunization and by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.

The health certificate shall also show all of the following:

(a) The date of immunization if immunization is required.

(b) The predominating breed of the swine.

(c) Approximate weight of the swine.

(d) Color of the swine.

(e) Markings of the swine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.

The original of the health certificate shall be attached to the way bill or shall be in the possession of the truck driver. A duplicate copy shall be sent to the Chief of the Division of Animal Industry of the department, at Sacramento, in time to reach him prior to the arrival of the swine within the state. A duplicate copy shall also be sent to the state veterinarian or livestock sanitary offical of the state of origin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.

Swine that are imported into this state for purposes other than for immediate slaughter shall be transported in crates, cars, trucks, or other vehicles that have been cleaned and disinfected in conformity with the standards that are prescribed by the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.

Swine that are imported into this state for immediate slaughter shall have as their destination a recognized slaughtering establishment. They shall not be diverted for any other purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 119, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sales Yards [10751. - 10753.]

10751.

Any person that operates a sales yard shall keep records of all swine which pass through the sales yard, including the name and address of every person who offers swine for sale and the name and address of every purchaser of swine from the yard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.

The sales yard records shall show definite information relative to description of animals, such as breed, weight, color, and marks. The records shall be kept on file for one year, during which time they shall be at the disposal of the director for inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly bring into, or cause to be brought into, any sales yard any swine that have been, within 21 days, treated with hog cholera virus, or which are affected with, or have been exposed to hog cholera, anthrax, swine erysipelas, vesicular exanthema, foot-and-mouth disease, or any other infectious disease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Swine Disease Control [10781. - 10786.]

10781.

The director may adopt regulations to control or eradicate hog cholera, swine brucellosis, pseudorabies, and other swine diseases in any of the following ways:

(a) Through limitations on the movement of swine.

(b) Through the use of hog cholera vaccine, or other biologics.

(c) Through tests or vaccinations.

(d) Any other similar means that he or she finds and determines is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10782.

The department, after notice and hearing, may revoke a license granted by the department to a person conducting business as a packer, stockyard, dealer, agent, or any individual that receives, transports or deals with the marketing of swine or swine products that violates this chapter or a regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.

A previous violation of any provision of this chapter, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, is sufficient cause for the revocation of a license under Section 10782. Proof of a previous violation of this code, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this article, shall be considered an aggravating factor for a current offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10784.

Any proceeding for the denial or revocation of a license pursuant to Section 10782 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall have all of the powers that are granted in that Chapter 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10785.

If the secretary finds and determines that similar regulations are necessary to control the diseases described in Section 10781 while hogs or swine are in interstate movement, the secretary shall notify the Governor so that the Governor may act pursuant to Section 9570.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10782 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10786.

(a) (1) Whenever a person violates any regulation that is adopted pursuant to this article, the department may impose an administrative penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per individual animal for each violation.

(2) If the department issues an administrative penalty pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall issue a Notice of Violation to the alleged offender or the offender’s agent. The notice shall be written in plain English and shall inform the offender as to how the offender may challenge the administrative penalty.

(b) (1) A willful and knowing violation of any regulation that is adopted pursuant to this article is a crime, punishable as (A) an infraction by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per individual animal for each violation, (B) a misdemeanor, or (C) a felony.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the imposition of an administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not preclude prosecution of a person pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10783 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Marking and Validations [10791. - 10791.]

10791.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations to require a person who possesses a domestic swine that has two or more phenotypical characteristics specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4650 of the Fish and Game Code to identify the swine with a brand, tattoo, or other permanent mark or visible validation approved by the department.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 37.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Garbage Control [10901. - 10990.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10901. - 10901.]

10901.

As used in this chapter, “garbage” means any waste which consists in whole or in part of any animal waste that results from the handling, preparing, cooking, and consuming of food, including the offal from any animal carcass or from any part of an animal carcass. It does not, however, include such waste from ordinary household operations which is fed directly to swine on the premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [10921. - 10923.]

10921.

The director may make and enforce such regulations as are reasonable and necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10922.

The director may enter any premises where garbage is fed to swine and may examine and test any equipment or facilities for processing and handling garbage. He may in writing order any person that is subject to this chapter to cease the operation of any equipment or facility which he finds is unsuitable or improperly operated or maintained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10923.

Every person that is subject to this chapter shall keep and maintain such records or memoranda and furnish such reports as the director by regulations may require. The records and memoranda shall be open to inspection by the director during usual business hours.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Processing [10951. - 10952.]

10951.

In order to prevent the spread of vesicular exanthema and other contagious and infectious diseases of swine, it is unlawful for any person to feed swine any garbage unless the garbage has been processed in accordance with the provisions of this article and the regulations which are adopted by the director pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.

All garbage, regardless of previous processing, before being fed to swine, shall be thoroughly heated throughout to boiling or equivalent temperature (usually 212 degrees Fahrenheit at sea level) for 30 minutes, or otherwise treated in a manner which is prescribed in the regulations of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licensing [10981. - 10990.]

10981.

It is unlawful for any person to feed garbage to swine unless he has a valid annual license issued by the director for each separate premises where garbage is fed to swine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10982.

An application for a license to feed garbage to swine shall be in the form which is prescribed by the director, and shall state all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) The location of the premises for which the license is requested.

(c) Such other information which the director may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10983.

Each application for a license shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10984.

An application for renewal of a license, accompanied by the proper fee, shall be made on or before the last day of the calendar year for which the current license was issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10985.

To any fee which is not paid when due, there shall be added a penalty of twenty dollars ($20).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10986.

Each license issued pursuant to this chapter entitles the licensee to feed garbage to swine on the premises that are described in the license, during the period for which the license is issued, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations issued under it and in compliance with any local or municipal ordinances which are applicable to the feeding of garbage to swine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10987.

The director may refuse to issue a license or renewal of license, and may revoke or suspend any license, as the case may require, if he finds after hearing, that any of the following exist:

(a) The premises which are described in the application or license are not operated in a clean and sanitary manner so as to prevent the continuation and spread of vesicular exanthema.

(b) The premises which are described in the application or license are not adequately equipped or maintained in the manner required by this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(c) The applicant or licensee has violated any lawful order of the director which is issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10988.

The proceedings for all hearings pursuant to this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2, of the Government Code. The director shall have all powers which are granted by such chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10989.

Any institution or agency of the state, a county, or any municipal or other public corporation which is feeding garbage to swine is not required to procure a license, but shall comply with all other provisions of this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10990.

This chapter does not prohibit any city or county from licensing persons that feed garbage to swine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ANIMALS DETRIMENTAL TO AGRICULTURE [11201. - 11305.]



  CHAPTER 1. Importation and Transportation [11201. - 11201.]

11201.

Sections 5025, 6304, and 6305 of this code are applicable to the importation into, or the shipment or transportation within, this state of animals which are detrimental to agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Predators [11221. - 11305.]



  ARTICLE 1. Hunters and Trappers [11221. - 11223.]

11221.

The director may employ hunters and trappers throughout the state to control or eradicate coyotes and other harmful predatory animals and to shoot or trap bears which are damaging livestock, agricultural crops, or standing timber.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11222.

For the purposes of this article, the director may enter into contracts with the Bureau of Sports Fisheries and Wildlife of the United States Department of the Interior to enlist the support of the federal government. He may prescribe the manner, terms, and conditions of such cooperation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11223.

No iron or steel-jawed trap shall be used by any hunter or trapper who is engaged in controlling or eradicating any bears pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Donations [11261. - 11262.]

11261.

The director may accept, on behalf of the state, donations of money from any person, board of supervisors, or other agency interested in the control of coyotes and other predatory animals. Any such money shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11262.

Money which is made available by any board of supervisors that is accepted pursuant to this article shall be expended solely within the boundaries of the county which makes the appropriation, unless otherwise authorized by the board of supervisors. All other donations shall be applied to the particular locality in which the donors are interested, unless they specifically consent to the use of their donations in other localities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Management of Coyotes on Public Lands [11281. - 11284.]

11281.

If any coyotes are found to exist on land which is owned by the state, other than lands subject to the control of the Department of Parks and Recreation and other than ecological reserves established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1580) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code and the coyotes are found to be causing damage on public or private land, the director may control, may employ persons pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 11221) to control, or may contract with the commissioner to control, the coyotes which are determined to be the cause of the damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11282.

Prior to implementation of any control program pursuant to this article, the director shall consult with and obtain the consent of the director of the department which has jurisdiction over the state land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11283.

The director shall submit an annual memorandum of understanding to the Director of Fish and Game for review and approval prior to implementing any coyote control program pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11284.

Nothing in this article authorizes the use of Compound 1080 for predator control on public lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Management of Coyotes on State Park Lands and in Ecological Reserves [11301. - 11305.]

11301.

As used in this article, “state park lands” means any lands subject to the control of the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

The director, upon receiving information causing him or her to believe that coyotes are finding refuge on state park lands or on ecological reserves and are causing damage to nearby private property, may request the Department of Parks and Recreation, in the case of state park lands, or the Department of Fish and Game, in the case of ecological reserves, to cooperate in the acquisition and evaluation of evidence to that effect. Upon a request by the director, the department or departments shall cooperate in the evaluation or acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11303.

Upon a determination pursuant to Section 11302 that coyotes are finding refuge on state park lands or on an ecological reserve and are causing damage to nearby private property, the director and the Department of Parks and Recreation, with the review and approval of the Director of Fish and Game as to state park lands, or the Department of Fish and Game as to ecological preserves, may enter into an interdepartmental agreement to control coyotes finding refuge on state park lands or on ecological reserves and causing damage to nearby private property. Methods utilized to take the coyotes shall be specific to those coyotes which are causing the damage. The Department of Parks and Recreation or the Department of Fish and Game shall specify the methods of take, location of take, time of take, necessary protections for public safety, protections convenient for state park lands or ecological reserve users and uses, and may specify whether the department is to employ persons to control coyotes pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 11221) or whether control is to be done by the Department of Parks and Recreation or the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11304.

The Department of Parks and Recreation or the Department of Fish and Game may submit claims to the department for reimbursement of direct costs incurred pursuant to the implementation of this article which shall be paid if found by the director to be reasonably necessary to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11305.

Nothing in this article authorizes the use of Compound 1080 for predator control on state park lands and in ecological reserves.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. PEST CONTROL OPERATIONS [11401. - 12408.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [11401. - 11485.]

11401.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.7.

“Integrated pest management” means an ecosystem-based strategy that focuses on long-term prevention of pests or their damage through a combination of techniques such as biological control, habitat manipulation, modification of cultural practices, and use of resistant varieties. Pesticides are used only after monitoring indicates they are needed according to established guidelines and treatments are made with the goal of removing only the target organism. Pest control materials are selected and applied in a manner that minimizes risks to human health, beneficial and nontarget organisms, and the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 2.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

“License” means pest control business license, agricultural pest control adviser’s license, or pest control dealer’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

“Pest control” means the use or application of any pesticide. It also means the use of any substance, method, or device to do any of the following:

(a) Control pests.

(b) Prevent, destroy, repel, mitigate, or correct any pest infestation or disorder of plants.

(c) Inhibit, regulate, stimulate, or otherwise alter plant growth by direct application to plants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

“Pesticide” is defined in Section 12753.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------
